Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 28 Unclaimed Property
18-28-401. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Holder” means a person, wherever organized or domiciled, who is:

(A)

In possession of property that belongs to another;

(B)

A trustee; or

(C)

Indebted to another on an obligation;

(2)

“Mineral” means oil, gas, uranium, sulphur, lignite, coal, and any other substance that is ordinarily and naturally considered a mineral in this state, regardless of the depth at which the substance is found; and

(3)

“Mineral proceeds” means all obligations:

(A)

To pay resulting from the production and sale of minerals from this state; and

(B)

For the acquisition and retention of a mineral lease to produce minerals located in this state.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 362, § 1.

18-28-402. Escrow accounts.

(a)(1)

A holder of mineral proceeds shall establish an escrow account for mineral proceeds if the person entitled to the receipt of the mineral proceeds is unknown or has not been located within one (1) year after the funds became payable or distributable.

(2)

The escrow account shall be for the benefit of the rightful recipient of the mineral proceeds.

(3)

A person showing to the holder of mineral proceeds sufficient proof of identity and marketable title to the property shall be promptly paid the sum accumulated for his or her benefit in the escrow account.

(b)(1)

If a holder of mineral proceeds is required to establish more than one (1) escrow account by operation of this section, then the mineral proceeds accruing may be commingled in a single escrow account.

(2)

Separate records of each deposit and withdrawal on behalf of specific persons shall be maintained.

(c)

A holder of mineral proceeds who violates this section is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(d)

The Auditor of State shall enforce this subchapter and may conduct random audits of the escrow accounts required by this section.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 362, § 3; 2003, No. 1763, § 1; 2005, No. 1994, § 95; 2009, No. 1175, § 18; 2015, No. 1039, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment inserted the subdivision designations in (a) and (b); inserted “or her” in present (a)(3); inserted “and the Oil and Gas Commission” in (c); inserted “the commission” in (c)(5); and added (e).

The 2005 amendment substituted “violation and upon conviction” for “misdemeanor and” in (d).

The 2009 amendment substituted “is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500)” for “shall be guilty of a violation and upon conviction shall be subject to a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000)” in (d).

The 2015 amendment substituted “marketable title to” for “ownership of” in (a)(3); deleted (c) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; deleted “for each violation” following “($2,500)” in present (c); and, in present (d), substituted “Auditor of State” for “commission”, deleted “the provisions of” following “enforce”, and substituted “may” for “shall”.

18-28-403. Abandoned mineral proceeds — Disposition of funds.

(a)(1)(A)

All mineral proceeds that are held or owing by the holder and that have remained unclaimed by the owner for longer than three (3) years after the mineral proceeds became payable or distributable are presumed abandoned.

(B)

Abandoned mineral proceeds are subject to the unclaimed property provisions of the Unclaimed Property Act, §18-28-201 et seq., except that funds received by the Auditor of State under this section shall be deposited by the Auditor of State into a special trust fund to be known as the “Abandoned Mineral Proceeds Trust Fund”.

(C)

The funds shall be deposited into accounts in one (1) or more financial institutions authorized to do business in this state and may then be transferred into the State Treasury Money Management Trust to be administered in accordance with the laws of this state.

(2)(A)

However, upon petition of the county attorney of the county in which the abandoned minerals were produced or severed, abandoned mineral proceeds that are held pursuant to leases executed by receivers or their successors appointed by a court of proper jurisdiction, shall be remitted by the holder to the county in which the minerals were produced or severed and deposited into the county general fund.

(B)

The county attorney shall publish notice of his or her petition in a legal newspaper having general circulation in the county, and the notice shall be published at least one (1) time.

(3)

The holder of abandoned mineral proceeds turned over to the Auditor of State under this section shall provide the following information to the Auditor of State:

(A)

The name and last known address of the property owner;

(B)

The applicable well name, uncontrolled lease name, or unitized area name as recognized by the Oil and Gas Commission;

(C)

Either:

(i)

The county, section, township, and range of the well; or

(ii)

The county, section, township, and range from which the abandoned minerals were severed or produced; and

(D)

Any other information required by the Auditor of State.

(b)

The Abandoned Mineral Proceeds Trust Fund shall be used by the Auditor of State to pay the claims of persons establishing ownership of mineral proceeds in possession of the state under this subchapter and for the enforcement and administration of this subchapter. At least one (1) time each fiscal year, the Auditor of State shall transfer to the County Aid Fund in the State Treasury all funds in the Abandoned Mineral Proceeds Trust Fund in excess of an amount determined by the Auditor of State to be sufficient to pay the anticipated expenses and claims of the Abandoned Mineral Proceeds Trust Fund.

(c)(1)

Funds credited to the County Aid Fund pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter shall annually be equally distributed among all the counties in the state by the Treasurer of State.

(2)

All funds remitted to the respective counties shall be credited to the county general fund.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 362, § 2; 1987 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 35, § 1; 1989, No. 904, § 1; 1989 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 39, § 2; 1993, No. 1153, § 12; 1995, No. 748, § 1; 2003, No. 1307, § 1; 2013, No. 1130, § 10; 2015, No. 1039, § 3; 2019, No. 325, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment substituted “five (5)” for “seven (7)” in (a)(1)(A).

The 2013 amendment, in (a)(1)(B), substituted “are” for “shall be” and deleted “the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act” following “property provisions of”.

The 2015 amendment substituted “three (3) years” for “five (5) years” in (a)(1)(A); substituted “under” for “pursuant to” in (a)(1)(B); substituted “one (1) time” for “two (2) times a week for two (2) consecutive weeks” in (a)(2)(B); and added (a)(3).

The 2019 amendment, in (a)(1)(C), inserted “and may then be transferred into the State Treasury Money Management Trust”, deleted “pertaining to the appropriation, administration, and expenditure of cash funds” following the second occurrence of “state”, and made stylistic changes.

18-28-404. Reports.

A report required to be made to the Auditor of State by a holder of abandoned mineral proceeds under this subchapter shall be submitted to the Auditor of State in an electronic format approved by the Auditor of State.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 1039, § 4.